Utah statutes.
67-10-2.   Accounts to be closed at end of fiscal year.

All officers who are required by law to report annually or biennially to the Legislature or governor shall close their accounts at the end of the fiscal year, and as soon thereafter as practicable shall prepare and compile the material for their respective reports.

